Hawaii statutes.
§386-97 Inspections. The director of
labor and industrial relations may inspect the plants and establishments of all
employers in the State and the inspectors designated by the director shall have
free access to such premises during regular working hours, and at other
reasonable times. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-112; HRS §386-97]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next